Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2627.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Vietnam War Veteran Sgt. Calvin G. Maguire Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Calvin Gene Maguire was born April 3, 1948, in Altoona to William Roy Maguire and Laura Mae Richards Maguire.(2) Sgt. Maguire attended Altoona Area High School.(3) Sgt. Maguire enlisted in the United States Army on February 20, 1967. His tour in Vietnam commenced on May 16, 1969.(4) Sgt. Maguire earned multiple decorations throughout 123456789101112131415161718 his service, including the Expert Badge for 11-14 Rifle, National Service Defense Medal, Purple Heart, Army Presidential Unit Citation, Combat Infantryman Badge, Vietnam Service Medal, Vietnam Gallantry Cross and Vietnam Campaign Medal.(5) Sgt. Maguire was killed in action on July 12, 1969, during his tour in Vietnam.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 42872, carrying State Route 4013 over Norfolk Southern Railroad and 8th Avenue in the City of Altoona, Blair County, is designated as the Vietnam War Veteran Sgt. Calvin G. Maguire Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2627PN3591 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617